Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.170

Statewide housing market analysis.

The office of community development of the department of commerce is directed to conduct a statewide housing market analysis by region. The purpose of the analysis is to identify areas of greatest need for the appropriate investment of state affordable housing funds, using vacancy data and other appropriate measures of need for low-income housing. The analysis shall include the number and types of projects that counties have developed using the funds collected under chapter 294, Laws of 2002. The analysis shall be completed by September 2003, and updated every two years thereafter.

[ 2009 c 565 s 10; 2002 c 294 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2002 c 294: See note following RCW 36.18.010.